Tennessee, session 114, SB0011.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-208, is amended by deleting the
second sentence of the section and substituting instead the following:
The department shall make the form available on the department's website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0011
000468
- 1 -